California, session 20252026, AB2318.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 832.11 is added to the Penal Code, to read:832.11. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Law enforcement” means any federal, state, or local law enforcement, acting under the color of the law, to the extent permitted by federal law.(2) “Medical professional” means an individual licensed or certified to provide emergency medical care. who is qualified by education, training, licensure, or regulation to perform a professional medical service within their scope of practice.(b) (1) It shall be unlawful for any law enforcement officer to deny, delay, obstruct, or fail to facilitate access to medical evaluation or treatment for an individual under law enforcement control if it is safe and reasonable to provide access to the treatment and a medical professional has been requested or is present or has been requested. and is willing to render care to the individual.(2) This subdivision does not apply to an individual in the custody of, or detained in, a county jail or the state prison.(c) (1) To the extent disclosure documenting the incident does not compromise an ongoing criminal investigation or officer safety, if access to medical evaluation or treatment is denied or delayed when a medical professional is present, present and is willing to assist, law enforcement shall provide written documentation indicating document the basis for the denial within 72 hours of the incident that meets all of the following requirements: and include the following information:(A) States the The basis for denial or delay.(B)Identifies the specific threat relied upon.(C)Provides a(B) A detailed incident narrative that includes, but is not limited to, time of the incident, location of the incident, and personnel involved in the incident.(D)Includes any(C) Any available supporting evidence, including body-worn camera footage, radio transmissions, or written incident reports.(2) Reporting pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the relevant civilian oversight body responsible for reviewing law enforcement conduct, the Office of the Inspector General, or the Attorney General.(d) Failure to comply with subdivision (b) or (c) may result in administrative discipline, including suspension or termination.(e)The Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall incorporate guidance on facilitating emergency medical access, scene security standards, and coordination with emergency medical services into law enforcement training curricula.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.